Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 15 Dentists and Dental Hygienists
§ 33-15-119.
Dental hygienists; generally.

Any dentist authorized to practice dentistry within the state may employ dental hygienists who shall be examined and possess the qualifications provided in this act. A dental hygienist may perform any services for a patient which are consistent with what dental hygienists are trained to do in accredited dental hygiene schools accredited by the commission on dental accreditation of the American Dental Association. Hygienists shall not perform any other operation on the teeth or mouth and shall be regulated by the rules and regulations promulgated by the board. The above services shall be performed under the supervision of a licensed dentist. Dental hygienists shall practice in the office of any licensed dentist, or in any public or private institution under the supervision of a licensed dentist. The board may revoke or suspend the license of any dentist who permits any dental hygienist operating under his supervision to perform any operations or functions other than those permitted under this act.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 9, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 34-201; C.S. 1945, § 37-1119; W.S. 1957, § 33-211; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 19; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.19; Laws 1979, ch. 74, § 1; 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 210, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to laboratory technicians, see §

33-15-117

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted “remove calcareous deposits, accretions and stains from the teeth and may” following “A dental hygienist may”, inserted “accredited by the commission on dental accreditation of the American Dental Association” at the end of the second sentence, deleted the former fifth sentence, deleted “dental hygienist for violating any provision hereof, and may revoke or suspend the license of any” following “suspend the license of any” and inserted “or functions” preceding “other than those permitted.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality, construction and application of statute relating to dental hygienists, 11 ALR2d 724.

§ 33-15-120.
Dental hygienists; qualifications; examination; fees and license.

Any person who has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of dental hygiene or to the ability to practice dental hygiene who is a graduate of a dental hygiene program accredited by the commission on dental accreditation of the American Dental Association, who has passed a written, clinical and state examination as determined by rule of the board may apply to the board to have the person’s qualifications considered for licensure to practice dental hygiene.

If the applicant fails the board examination three (3) times, he shall show evidence of additional education to the satisfaction of the board before reexamination.

If the applicant successfully completes the requirements for licensure, the applicant shall be licensed as a dental hygienist. If the expanded duties applicant has successfully met the requirements for expanded duties, the applicant shall be certified in those expanded duties. The certificate issued by the board shall list the expanded duties which the hygienist is qualified and permitted to perform. On or before December 31 of every second year, each dental hygienist licensed to practice dental hygiene and wishing to continue in the practice of dental hygiene shall submit a license renewal application with the applicable renewal fee. The renewal certificate shall be made available to the supervising dentist. Any license granted by the board shall expire if the holder fails to secure the renewal certificate within three (3) months after the date that the license renewal application is required to be submitted. Any license that has expired may be restored by the board upon payment of a fee set by the board, if paid by December 31 of the year the license expired.

Any dental hygienist whose application for renewal indicates that the hygienist has not actively practiced dental hygiene or engaged in teaching dental hygiene for the preceding five (5) years shall be issued a renewal certificate only after demonstrating to the board that the hygienist has maintained the qualifications set forth in this act. The board may require reexamination if it finds good cause to believe that the person has not maintained the professional ability and knowledge required of an original licensee under this act.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the licensure of dental hygienists and the practice of dental hygiene, and may prescribe continuing education requirements for renewal certificates and relicensure.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 9, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 34-202; C.S. 1945, § 37-1120; Laws 1955, ch. 242, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 33-212; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 20; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.20; Laws 1979, ch. 74, § 1; 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 2007, ch. 210, § 2; 2009, ch. 181, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018; 2021 ch. 107, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote section generally.

The 2009 amendment,

in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “who has passed in a manner satisfactory to the board” for “who has completed in a manner satisfactory to the board” and substituted “who passes any clinical board” for “who has completed any clinical board.”

Laws 2009, ch. 181, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2009.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “who has a background that does not evidence conduct adverse to the practice of dental hygiene or to the ability to practice dental hygiene” for “of good moral character” following “Any person.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (a), substituted "a written, clinical and state examination as determined" for "in a manner satisfactory to the board the dental hygiene national board examination administered by the joint commission on national dental examinations of the American Dental Association and who passes any clinical board accepted" and added "rule of" preceding "the board may," deleted the former second sentence, which read, "Applicants shall be required to pass a written examination satisfactory to the board"; in (c), substituted "of every second" for "each" in the fourth sentence, in the sixth sentence, substituted "expire" for "be cancelled after ten (10) days notice by registered mail," "the date that the license renewal application is required to be submitted" for "December 31 each year," in the last senence, substituted "that has expired" for "cancelled" and "expired" for "was cancelled."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 107, § 2, provides: "The provisions of this act shall apply to the 2021-2022 application cycle for the board of dental examiners."

§ 33-15-121.
Grounds and proceedings for suspension of, revocation of, or refusal to renew license.

The board may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke, the license of any dental hygienist for any of the following causes:

Conviction of, entry of a plea of nolo contendere to or entry of a deferred prosecution agreement pursuant to W.S.

7-13-301

to a felony or misdemeanor that relates adversely to the practice of dental hygiene or the ability to practice dental hygiene;

Unprofessional conduct, as defined in rules and regulations of the board;

Advertising or soliciting patients, in any form of communication, in a manner that is false or misleading in any material respect;

Renting or loaning to another person the hygienist’s license or diploma to be used as a license or diploma for the other person;

Being unfit or incompetent to practice dental hygiene for any reason, including but not limited to:

Inability to practice dental hygiene with reasonable skill and safety because of physical or mental disability or the use of alcohol, prescription drugs, nonprescription drugs or other psychoactive substance; or

Performance of unsafe dental hygiene practice or failure to conform to the standards of acceptable professional dental hygiene practice, whether or not actual injury results.

Professional discipline by a professional licensing board in any jurisdiction;

Fraud, deceit or misrepresentation in providing any information or record to the board; or

For willful violation of any provision of this act or rules and regulations of the board.

All proceedings by the board pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be as set forth in W.S. 33-15-112(b) for the revocation or suspension of a dentist’s license.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 122, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 37-1117; W.S. 1957, § 33-207; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 21; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.21; Laws 1979, ch. 74, § 1; 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2007, ch. 210, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, rewrote section generally.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-122.
[Repealed].

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 210, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1905, ch. 89, § 10, related to reciprocity granted to dentists licensed in other states.

§ 33-15-123.
Duties of other dental auxiliary.

Duties of all other dental auxiliary personnel not mentioned in this act shall be set and governed by the rules and regulations of the board.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 33-192.23; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-124.
Violations.

Any person who practices dentistry without being properly qualified and licensed, or who violates any provisions of this act is subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisonment not more than two (2) years in the penitentiary, or both. Each separate violation of this act constitutes a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 122, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 37-1118; W.S. 1957, § 33-209; Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 24; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 33-192.24; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-125.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 25, related to prosecutions.

§ 33-15-126.
Regulation of proceedings relating to revocation or suspension of licenses.

All proceedings before the board relating to the revocation or suspension of licenses shall be conducted according to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, except appeals under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall not be allowed for revocations, suspensions or other restrictions imposed on licenses pursuant to W.S. 33-15-112(c) or 33-15-121(c).

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 33-192.26; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2.

§ 33-15-127.
Action for injunction.

The board in its own name may bring an action for an injunction, and courts of this state may enjoin any person from violation of this act. Such proceedings shall be prosecuted by the attorney general’s office or by private counsel.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 35, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 33-192.27; Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For meaning of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xviii).

§ 33-15-128.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the Wyoming board of dental examiners established by this act;

“Dentistry” means the healing art practiced by a dentist which is concerned with the examination, diagnosis, treatment, planning and care of conditions within the human oral cavity and its adjacent tissues and structures;

“Dentist” means a person who performs any intraoral and extraoral procedure required in the practice of dentistry and to whom is reserved:

The responsibility for final diagnosis of conditions within the human mouth and its adjacent tissues and structures;

The responsibility of the final treatment plan of any dental patient;

The responsibility for prescribing drugs which are administered to patients in the practice of dentistry;

The responsibility for overall quality of patient care which is rendered or performed in the practice of dentistry regardless of whether the care is rendered personally by the dentist or by a dental auxiliary; and

Other specific services within the scope of the practice of dentistry.

“Dental” means pertaining to dentistry;

“Dental hygienist” means a person who is supervised by a dentist and is licensed to render the educational, preventive and therapeutic dental services defined in this act, as well as any extraoral procedure required in the practice of a dental hygienist’s duties;

“Dental assistant” means a person who is supervised by a dentist and renders assistance to a dentist, dental hygienist, dental technician or another dental assistant as described in this act;

“Dental laboratory” means an enterprise engaged in making, repairing, providing or altering oral prosthetic appliances and other artificial materials and devices which are returned to the dentist and inserted into the human mouth or which come into contact with its adjacent structures and tissues;

“Dental laboratory technician” means a person who, at the direction of a licensed dentist, makes, provides, repairs or alters oral prosthetic appliances and other artificial devices which are inserted into the human mouth or which come into contact with the human mouth and its adjacent tissues and structures. A dental technician is a dental prosthetic auxiliary working under the supervision of a licensed dentist;

“Dental auxiliary” means any person who works under the supervision of a dentist and who provides dental care services to a patient;

“Supervision” of a dental auxiliary means the act of directing or overseeing duties performed by a dental auxiliary, as defined by rules and regulations of the board;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 210, § 3.

“Proprietor” includes any person who:

Employs dentists, dental hygienists or dental auxiliaries in the operation of a dental office, except as defined in this act; or

Places in the possession of a dentist, dental hygienist or dental auxiliary or other agent such dental material or equipment as may be necessary for the management of a dental office on the basis of a lease or any other agreement for compensation for the use of such material, equipment or offices; or

Retains the ownership or control of dental equipment or material or office and makes the same available in any manner for the use by dentists, dental hygienists, dental auxiliaries or any other agents, excepting that nothing in this subparagraph shall apply to bona fide sales of dental equipment or material secured by a chattel mortgage or retain-title agreement or the loan of articulators.

“Expanded duties” means those patient’s services which are beyond those regularly practiced by dental hygienists or dental technicians or other dental auxiliary functions and which require additional education which shall be approved by the board of dental examiners of Wyoming and are to be performed under the direct supervision of a licensed dentist;

“Specialty” means a special area of dental practice for ethical specialty announcement and limitation of practice which are dental public health, endodontics, oral pathology, oral and maxillofacial surgery, orthodontics, pediatric dentistry, periodontics, prosthodontics, oral and maxillofacial radiology and any other specialty area recognized by the board of dental examiners of Wyoming;

“Radiograph” means the film used with an x-ray machine and includes the product of a film exposed by an x-ray machine;

“X-ray machine” means an assemblage of components for the controlled production of x-rays. It includes at a minimum an x-ray high voltage generator, an x-ray control, a tube housing assembly, a beam limiting device and the necessary supporting structures;

“This act” means W.S.

33-15-101

through

33-15-133

and may be cited as the “Wyoming Dental Practice Act”.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 172, § 1; 1990, ch. 113, § 2; 2003, ch. 116, § 2; 2007, ch. 210, §§ 2, 3.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), inserted “licensed” in two places in (viii), repealed former (xi), which pertained to the definition of “‘Unprofessional conduct,’” substituted “pediatric dentistry, periodontics, prosthodontics, oral and maxillofacial radiology” for “pedodontics, periodontics, prostodontics” in (xiv), substituted “33-15-133” for “33-15-131” in (xvii), and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Denturist not licensed to practice dentistry. —

District court properly upheld ruling of Wyoming Board of Dental Examiners that “denturist” was practicing dentistry without a license as a matter of law, rejecting argument that denturist was involved in the “mechanical task” of creating a prosthetic, not in curing disease; denturist's services violated Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

33-15-114

because he personally examined his customers, created their dentures, and later adjusted those dentures, if necessary.
Vollan v. Wyo. Bd. of Dental Exam'rs, 2007 WY 132, 165 P.3d 103,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Wyo. 2007).

Applied

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

§ 33-15-129.
Radiograph use permits.

Any dental assistant who places or exposes radiographs shall hold a radiograph use permit.

Any licensed dentist using an x-ray machine shall have that machine inspected by a qualified radiation expert periodically as determined by the board.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations necessary for granting or revoking a radiograph use permit and for inspection of x-ray machines.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 113, § 1.

§ 33-15-130.
General anesthesia or parenteral sedation permit.

Any dentist licensed under this act who administers general anesthesia or parenteral sedation shall apply for and receive a general anesthesia or parenteral sedation permit. The permit shall be issued to a licensed dentist who passes an appropriate examination and has the necessary equipment as defined by the board.

The board shall provide for the inspection of the anesthesia and sedation equipment of permitted dentists on a regular basis to insure the equipment is of the appropriate type and is in working order.

Any dentist using general anesthesia or parenteral sedation without a permit may have his license revoked or suspended.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations, including establishing examination fees, as necessary to carry out this section.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 113, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-131.
Dentist and dental hygienist volunteer license.

As used in this section:

“Low income uninsured person” means a person who meets all of the following requirements:

The person’s income is not greater than two hundred percent (200%) of the current poverty level as defined by federal law, as amended;

The person currently is not receiving medical, disability or other assistance under any federal or state government health care program; and

Either of the following applies:

The person is not a policyholder, certificate holder, insured, contract holder, subscriber, enrollee, member, beneficiary or other covered individual under a health insurance or health care policy, contract or plan; or

The person is a policyholder, certificate holder, insured, contract holder, subscriber, enrollee, member, beneficiary or other covered individual under a health insurance or health care policy, contract or plan, but the insurer, policy, contract or plan denies coverage or is the subject of insolvency or bankruptcy proceedings in any jurisdiction.

“Nonprofit health care facility” means a charitable nonprofit corporation or association organized and operated under title 17, chapter 19 or 22 of the Wyoming statutes, or any charitable organization not organized and not operated for profit, that provides health care services to low income uninsured persons, except that “health care facility” does not include a hospital, including a swing bed hospital, facility or center defined under W.S.

35-2-901

or any other medical facility that is operated for profit.

For purposes of this section, a person shall be considered retired from practice if the person’s license or certificate has expired.

The state board of dental examiners may issue, with or without examination, a volunteer’s certificate to a person who is retired from practice so that the person may provide dental services to low income uninsured persons at nonprofit health care facilities. The board shall deny issuance of a volunteer’s certificate to a person who is not qualified under this section to hold a volunteer’s certificate.

An application for a volunteer’s certificate shall include all of the following:

A copy of the applicant’s dentistry or dental hygienist degree;

One (1) of the following, as applicable:

A copy of the applicant’s most recent license or certificate authorizing the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene issued by a jurisdiction in the United States that licenses persons to practice dentistry or dental hygiene; or

A copy of the applicant’s most recent license equivalent to a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in one (1) or more branches of the United States armed services that the United States government issued.

Evidence of one (1) of the following, as applicable:

That the applicant has maintained for at least ten (10) years immediately prior to retirement full licensure in good standing in any jurisdiction in the United States that licenses persons to practice as a dentist or dental hygienist; or

That the applicant has practiced for at least ten (10) years immediately prior to retirement in good standing as a dentist or dental hygienist in one (1) or more of the branches of the United States armed services; and

A notarized statement from the applicant, on a form prescribed by the board, that the applicant:

Will not accept any form of remuneration for any dental or dental hygiene services rendered while in possession of a volunteer’s certificate;

Will devote his practice exclusively and totally to providing dental or dental hygiene services to low income uninsured persons at a nonprofit health care facility in this state; and

Will provide any other documentation that the board reasonably may require.

The holder of a volunteer’s certificate may provide dental or dental hygiene services only on the premises of a nonprofit health care facility in this state and only to low income uninsured persons. The holder shall not accept any form of remuneration for providing dental or dental hygiene services while in possession of the certificate. The board may revoke a volunteer’s certificate on receiving proof satisfactory to the board that the holder has engaged in practice in this state outside the scope of the certificate.

A volunteer’s certificate shall be valid for a period of one (1) year, unless earlier revoked under subsection (e) of this section or pursuant to title 33, chapter 15 of the Wyoming statutes. A volunteer’s certificate may be renewed upon the application of the holder. The board shall maintain a register of all persons who hold volunteer’s certificates. The board shall not charge a fee for issuing or renewing a certificate pursuant to this section.

To be eligible for renewal of a volunteer’s certificate, the holder of the certificate shall certify to the board completion of any continuing education required under this act as if the holder of the certificate were in active practice. The board shall not renew a certificate if the holder has not complied with the continuing education requirements. The nonprofit health care facility in which the holder provides dental or dental hygiene services may pay for or reimburse the holder for any costs incurred in obtaining the required continuing education.

The board shall issue to each person who qualifies under this section a volunteer’s certificate that states the certificate holder is authorized to provide dental or dental hygiene services pursuant to the laws of this state.

Except as provided in this section, any person holding a volunteer’s certificate issued by the board under this section shall be subject to the requirements of this act and the jurisdiction of the board as if he were licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene under this act.

The board shall adopt rules to administer and enforce this section.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 116, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” see § 33-15-128(a)(xvii).

§ 33-15-132.
Immunity from personal liability.

Members, agents and employees of the board and any person reporting information to the board under oath shall be immune from personal liability with respect to acts done and actions taken in good faith without fraud or malice.

The immunity provided by this section shall extend to the members of any professional review committee, investigators and witnesses appearing before the board.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 210, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 210, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 33-15-133.
Temporary educator's license.

A temporary license may be issued to any dentist or dental hygienist who has applied for licensure and who exhibits good standing in another jurisdiction of the United States or Canada and has qualified for the requirements to be employed as an instructor at a dental hygiene school.

The temporary educator’s license shall be valid only until the meeting of the board at which the educator’s application for standard licensure is considered.

The temporary educator license does not permit the licensee to practice outside of the educational institution at which the licensee is employed as an instructor.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 210, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 210, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.